Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 1

General Provisions

42-3-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Airport Authorities Act.”

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 22; T.C.A., § 42-601.

Cross-References. Authority to regulate passenger transportation services, title 7, ch. 51, part 10.

Contracts and mutual aid agreements, §6-54-601.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Metropolitan Airport Authorities, title 42, ch. 4.

Mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Open Meetings Act applicable to authority, OAG 96-131 (11/14/96).

Comparative Legislation. Airport authorities:

Ala. Code §4-3-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 183.132 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §61-3-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 305.300 et seq.

Va. Code § 5.1-2.23 et seq.

Cited: Niswonger v. American Aviation, Inc., 424 F. Supp. 1080, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16844 (E.D. Tenn. 1976); Metaljan v. Memphis-Shelby County Airport Authority, 752 F. Supp. 834, 1990 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16904 (W.D. Tenn. 1990); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Dunn, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 130 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Fenimore, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 131 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Ingrum, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 132 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Lassiter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 133 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Gregory, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 134 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Reese, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 135 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Camilla Jean Palmer Revocable Living Trust, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 136 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Law, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 137 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. McKee, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 138 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Pryor, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 139 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Marcum, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 140 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006).

42-3-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Air navigation facility” means any facility, other than a facility owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in, aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of such facilities;

“Airport” means any area of land or water that is used, or intended for use, for the landing and taking off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas that are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or avigation easements or rights-of-way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located on those areas;

“Airport authority” or “authority” means any regional airport authority or municipal airport authority created pursuant to this chapter;

“Airport hazard” means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft;

“Avigation easement” means any easement that shall include all or any part of the following:

The right to unobstructed and unrestricted flight of aircraft, in, through and across the airspace over and above certain land, beginning at the altitude or height above the surface of the land as determined by the airport authority;

The right to enter upon certain described land for the purpose of removing and preventing any use of the land or the construction or erection of any buildings, structures or facilities and the growth of any trees or objects upon the real estate, over, above and across such certain described land, other than those uses, buildings, structures, facilities, growths of trees or objects expressly excepted; and

The right to prevent the use of the land by any assembly of persons or the use of the land in such a manner as might attract or bring together an assembly of persons on the land;

“Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or similar obligations issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter;

“Clerk” means the custodian of the official records of a municipality;

“Governing body” means the official or officials authorized by law to exercise ordinance or other law-making powers of a municipality, county or political subdivision of another state;

“Municipal airport authority” or “municipal authority” means a municipal airport created pursuant to § 42-3-103;

“Municipality” means any county, or any incorporated city or incorporated town of this state;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative of the individual or organization; and

“Regional airport authority” or “regional authority” means a regional airport authority created pursuant to § 42-3-104.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 1; 1977, ch. 471, § 3; T.C.A., § 42-602; Acts 2010, ch. 802, § 1.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added “, county or political subdivision of another state” to the end of the definition of “governing body”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 802, § 3. July 1, 2010.

Cited: Chapman v. Sullivan County, 608 S.W.2d 580, 1980 Tenn. LEXIS 511 (Tenn. 1980); Lewis v. Cleveland Mun. Airport Auth., 289 S.W.3d 808, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 808 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 11, 2008).

Collateral References.

Liability of United States for negligence of air traffic controller. 46 A.L.R. Fed. 24.

42-3-103. Creation of municipal airport authority — Dissolution of municipal airport authority.

Authorization; Ordinance or Resolution Commissioners; Removal of Commissioners.

Any municipality may, by ordinance if a city or town, or by resolution if a county, create a municipal airport authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the appointment and qualification of the first commissioners of the authority, and the issuance of a certificate of incorporation by the secretary of state. Upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution, whichever is applicable, creating a municipal airport authority, the governing body of the municipality shall, pursuant to the ordinance or resolution, appoint at least five (5) and no more than eleven (11) persons as commissioners of the authority. The commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4), and five (5) years, respectively, but thereafter, each commissioner shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality for a term of five (5) years, except that vacancies occurring otherwise than by the expiration of terms shall be filled by the governing body of the municipality for the unexpired term, in the same manner as the original appointments.

The governing body of the municipality or the county may, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body upon written charges and after a public hearing, remove any or all of the commissioners of the authority for incompetency, failure or neglect to perform the duties required by law, malfeasance, misfeasance, misconduct or corruption in office or for any other good and sufficient reason. If removed, a vacancy shall exist on the authority of the commissioner or commissioners so removed and the vacancy shall be filled by the governing body for the unexpired term in the same manner as in the case of the original appointment.

Application; Certificate; Corporate Existence.

The commissioners of the airport authority shall present to the secretary of state an application signed by them, which shall set forth, without any detail other than mere recital:

That the governing body of the municipality by ordinance or resolution created a municipal airport authority and thereafter appointed them as commissioners;

The name and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office, the date and place of induction into and taking oath of office and that they desire the municipal airport authority to become a public body corporate and politic under this chapter;

The term of office of each of the commissioners;

The name that is proposed for the corporation; and

The location of the principal office of the proposed corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of the state to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that such officer personally knows the commissioners, and knows them to be the officers as appointed in the application, and that each subscribed and swore thereto in the officer's presence. The secretary of state shall examine the application and if the secretary of state finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation of this state, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded as provided in this subsection (b), the authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application. The secretary of state shall make and issue to the commissioners a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this chapter, under the seal of the state and shall record the certificate with the application.

Upon receiving the certificate of incorporation, the commissioners shall cause the certificate to be placed of record in the register's office of the county in which the airport authority has its principal office.

This section shall not apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000).

The county legislative body of any county that has created a municipal airport authority where the commissioners of the airport authority have, without legal authority to do so in accordance with § 42-3-104, altered their certificate of authority filed with the secretary of state, referring to the municipal airport created pursuant to this section as a regional airport authority, shall have the authority, if the county legislative body determines that it is in the best interest of the county that the airport authority so created be dissolved, then upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body, the county mayor shall execute and file for record with the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution reciting those facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. The resolution shall be read and passed upon two (2) separate readings at two (2) consecutive meetings in open session. At least thirty (30) days shall have elapsed between the first and second readings. Any resolution not so read and passed shall be null and void.

The resolution dissolving the airport authority shall further provide whether the governing body of the municipality shall become the governing body to operate the airport.

Upon filing the certificate, the authority shall be dissolved, and title to all funds and other properties of the authority at the time of the dissolution shall vest in and be delivered to the county to which this subsection (d) applies.

If within twelve (12) months of the dissolution, the county by resolution, votes to create a new municipal airport authority in the manner provided in this part, any grants or funds that had been given to or received by the previous, now dissolved, authority for its operation shall not be forfeited but for purposes of the funds or grants, the new authority created under this subdivision (d)(3) shall be deemed to be the named recipient authority of the funds or grants unless otherwise provided by specific language in the funds or grants.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-603; Acts 1996, ch. 624, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 446, §§ 1, 2, 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “by the governing body of the municipality” twice in the third sentence of (a)(1); and added (a)(2) and (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 446, § 6. June 23, 2009.

Attorney General Opinions. Where a municipal airport authority was created by a city ordinance, that ordinance governs the number of commissioners and may be amended by the city legislative body, OAG 06-027 (2/8/06).

Dissolution of a municipal airport authority created under the Airport Authorities Act. OAG 16-14, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (4/5/2016).

42-3-104. Creation of regional airport authority — Changes as to municipalities served.

Authorization; Resolution; Appointment and Removal of Commissioners.

Two (2) or more municipalities may, by resolution of each, create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a regional airport authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of incorporation. The governing body of each municipality shall, pursuant to its resolution, appoint one (1) person as a commissioner of the authority; provided, that if the regional airport authority consists of an even number of municipalities, an additional commissioner shall be appointed by the governor.

In addition to the procedure set forth in subdivision (a)(1), one (1) or more municipalities and one (1) or more counties may, by resolution of each, create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a regional airport authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of incorporation. The governing body of each participating municipality and the governing body of each participating county shall, pursuant to its resolution, appoint two (2) persons as commissioners of the authority. When the appointed commissioners convene, their first item of business shall be to appoint one (1) additional commissioner. If the commissioners cannot agree on the appointment of the additional commissioner, that position shall be filled by appointment of the governor.

In addition to the procedures set forth in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), when three (3) or more municipalities and counties and at least one (1) political subdivision of another state jointly create and participate in a regional airport commission, then all such municipalities, counties, and the political subdivisions of another state who have participated in such regional airport commission, may, by resolution of each, create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a regional airport authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of incorporation. The governing body of each participating municipality and the governing body of each participating county and the governing body of each political subdivision of another state shall, pursuant to its resolution, appoint the same number of persons as commissioners of the authority as existed in the regional airport commission. Such number of commissioners shall be specified in the certificate of incorporation.

A commissioner or all of the commissioners of an authority may be removed for incompetency, failure or neglect to perform the duties required by law, malfeasance, misfeasance, misconduct or corruption in office or for any other good and sufficient reason.

If the governor makes an appointment pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2), the governor is authorized to remove the commissioner so appointed upon written charges and after a public hearing.

The governing body of the municipality, county, political subdivision of another state or the commissioners of the regional airport authority, as appropriate, that made the original appointment or appointments pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(3) are authorized to remove the commissioner or commissioners so appointed by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of the municipality, county, political subdivision of another state or regional airport authority, as appropriate, upon written charges and after a public hearing.

If removed, a vacancy shall exist on the authority of the commissioner or commissioners so removed and the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the governing body of the municipality, county, political subdivision of another state or the commissioners of the regional airport authority or the governor, as appropriate, in the same manner as in the case of the original appointment.

Increase in Municipalities Served. A regional airport authority may be increased from time to time to serve one (1) or more additional municipalities if each additional municipality and each of the municipalities then included in the regional authority and the commissioners of the regional authority, respectively, adopt a resolution consenting to the increase; provided, that if a municipal airport authority for any municipality seeking to be included in the regional authority is then in existence, the commissioners of the municipal authority consent to the inclusion of the municipality in the regional authority; and provided further, that if the municipal authority has any bonds outstanding, that the holders of at least sixty percent (60%) of the bonds consent, in writing, to the inclusion of the municipality in the regional authority. Upon the inclusion of any municipality in the regional authority, all rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of the municipal authority shall be in the name of and vest in the regional authority.

Decrease in Municipalities Served. A regional airport authority may be decreased if each of the municipalities then included in the regional authority and the commissioners of the regional authority consent to the decrease and make provisions for the retention or disposition of its assets and liabilities; provided, that if the regional authority has any bonds outstanding, no decrease shall be effected unless the holders of at least sixty percent (60%) of the bonds consent to the decrease in writing.

Notice and Hearing as to Ordinances and Resolutions. A municipality shall not adopt any ordinance or resolution authorized by this section without a public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be given at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing in a newspaper published in the municipality, or, if there is no newspaper published in the municipality, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality.

Term of Commissioners — Vacancies. All commissioners of a regional airport authority created in accordance with subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years each, except that a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments. Appointments at the expiration of a term shall be filled by the governing body of the participating municipality, the governing body of the participating county, or by the commissioners or the governor, as appropriate, that made the original appointments in accordance with subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2).

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 3; T.C.A., § 42-604; Acts 1991, ch. 486, § 1; 2009, ch. 446, §§ 3, 5; 2010, ch. 802, § 2; 2011, ch. 139, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (a)(3); and added the last sentence of (e).

The 2010 amendment, in (a), added (3) and redesignated former (3) as present (4); and, in present (4), inserted “political subdivision of another state” twice in (C) and once near the end of (D), and substituted “subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(3)” for “subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2)” near the middle of (C).

The 2011 amendment, rewrote the first sentence in (a)(3) which read: “In addition to the procedure set forth in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), when three (3) or more municipalities and counties and at least one (1) political subdivision of another state jointly create and participate in a regional airport commission and a majority of such municipalities and counties, by resolution of each, recommend the creation of a regional airport authority, and upon each participating municipality and county and political subdivision of another state entering an interlocal agreement pursuant to title 12, chapter 9, part 1, that is approved by the attorney general and reporter before the interlocal agreement takes effect, then each participating municipality, county and political subdivision of another state shall, by resolution of each, create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a regional airport authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of incorporation.”; and, in (e), inserted “created in accordance with subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2)” in the first sentence and inserted the comma following “participating county” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 446, § 6. June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 802, § 3. July 1, 2010.

Acts 2011, ch. 139, § 4. May 2, 2011.

42-3-105. Certificate of incorporation of regional airport authority.

Original Certificate.

The commissioners of the regional airport authority shall present to the secretary of state an application signed by them, which shall set forth, without any detail other than mere recital:

That the governing bodies (naming the municipalities) of the municipalities by ordinances or resolutions created a regional airport authority and thereafter appointed them as commissioners;

The name and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office, the date and place of induction into and taking oath of office, and that they desire the municipal airport authority to become a public body and a body corporate and politic under this chapter;

The term of office of each of the commissioners;

The name that is proposed for the corporation; and

The location of the principal office of the proposed corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of the state to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that the officer personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as appointed in the application and that each subscribed and swore thereto in the officer's presence. The secretary of state shall examine the application and if the secretary of state finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation of this state, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded, as provided in subdivision (a)(1), the authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application and the secretary of state shall make and issue to the commissioners a certificate of incorporation, pursuant to this chapter, under the seal of the state and shall record the certificate with the application.

Upon receiving the certificate of incorporation, the commissioners shall cause it to be placed of record in the register's office of each county in which is located one (1) or more of the participating municipalities.

Amended Certificate. When a regional airport authority is increased or decreased pursuant to § 42-3-104, it shall forward to the secretary of state a certified copy of each resolution adopted pursuant to the increase or decrease and upon receipt of the resolution, the secretary of state shall issue an amended certificate of incorporation in accordance with the resolution, which amended certificate shall be placed of record in the county register's office of each county in which is located one (1) or more of the participating municipalities.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 4; T.C.A., § 42-605.

42-3-106. Proof of existence of authority.

Municipal Authorities. In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of a municipal airport authority, created pursuant to § 42-3-103, the municipal authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact its business and exercise its powers under this chapter upon proof of the adoption by the municipality of the resolution creating the municipal airport authority, the appointment and qualification of the first commissioners of the authority, and of the issuance and recording of a certificate of incorporation. Duly certified copies of the resolution creating the authority, the certificates of appointment of the commissioners, and the certificate of incorporation shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding.

Regional Authorities. In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of a regional airport authority, the regional airport authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact its business and exercise its powers under this chapter upon proof of the issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of incorporation of the regional airport authority. A copy of the certificate of incorporation, duly certified by the secretary of state, or by the county register in whose office the certificate of incorporation is recorded, shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 5; T.C.A., § 42-606.

42-3-107. Commissioners.

A commissioner of an authority shall receive no compensation for services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of the commissioner's duties.

Each commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and has qualified. The certificates of the appointment and reappointment of commissioners shall be filed with the authority.

The powers of each authority shall be vested in the commissioners of the authority. A majority of the commissioners of an authority shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business of the authority and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon a vote of not less than a majority of the commissioners present.

There shall be elected a chair and vice chair from among the commissioners. An authority may employ an executive director, secretary, technical experts and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. For such legal services as it may require, an authority may call upon the chief law officer of the municipality or municipalities included in the authority or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one (1) or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 6; T.C.A., § 42-607.

42-3-108. General powers — Motor vehicle traffic regulations.

An authority has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter (excluding the power to levy and collect taxes or special assessments) including, but not limited to, the power to:

Sue and be sued;

Have a seal;

Have perpetual succession; and

Have such immunity in tort cases as do municipalities under the Municipal Airport Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title;

Execute such contracts and other instruments and take such other action as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Plan, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and protect airports and air navigation facilities, within this state and within any adjoining state, including the acquisition, construction, installation, equipment, maintenance, and operation of such airports or buildings and other facilities for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers, and the purchase and sale of supplies, goods, and commodities as are incident to the operation of its airport properties. For such purposes, an authority may, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, acquire property, real or personal, or any interest in property, including avigation easements and easements in airport hazards or land outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site, as are necessary to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction-marking, or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards or to prevent the establishment of airport hazards;

Acquire by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, existing airports and air navigation facilities; provided, that an authority shall not acquire or take over any airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by another authority, a municipality, or public agency of this or any other state without the consent of that authority, municipality, or public agency; and

Establish or acquire and maintain airports in, over, and upon any public waters of this state or any submerged lands under public waters; and construct and maintain terminal buildings, landing floats, causeways, roadways, and bridges for approaches to or connecting with any such airport, and landing floats and breakwaters for the protection of such structures.

Any authority that is operated by a board of commissioners whose membership is appointed by the legislative bodies of five (5) or more local governments has the power to promulgate, adopt, and enforce such motor vehicle traffic regulations for airport authority property as may be necessary to provide for the public safety.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 7; T.C.A., § 42-608; Acts 1988, ch. 501, § 1.

Cross-References. Immunity under Municipal Airport Act, §42-5-122.

Attorney General Opinions. Because an airport authority has discretion to determine the fees applicable to businesses operating on its property when it enters into contracts or other agreements with those businesses, it may impose a fuel flowage fee as part of those agreements. An airport authority may enter into agreements that require non-profit entities to pay fuel flowage fees. OAG 18-32, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (7/20/2018).

Cited: Lewis v. Cleveland Mun. Airport Auth., 289 S.W.3d 808, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 808 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 11, 2008).

42-3-109. Eminent domain.

In the acquisition of property by eminent domain proceedings authorized by this chapter, an authority shall proceed in the manner provided by title 29, chapter 16. For the purpose of making surveys and examinations relative to eminent domain proceedings, it is lawful for the authority to enter upon the land, doing no unnecessary damage. Notwithstanding any other statute or other law, an authority may take possession of any property to be acquired by eminent domain proceedings at any time after the commencement of the proceedings. The authority shall not be precluded from abandoning the proceedings in any case where possession of the property has not been taken, even after a trial jury in circuit court has rendered a verdict as to damages for the property taken and at any time prior to the entry of a final decree disposing of the entire eminent domain proceedings.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 8; T.C.A., § 42-609.

Cited: Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Kirkham, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 118 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Webster, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 122 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Warren, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 123 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Walter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 124 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Wallace, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 125 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Stephenson, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 126 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Rippy, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 127 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Carter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 128 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Knight, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 129 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Dunn, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 130 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Fenimore, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 131 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Ingrum, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 132 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Lassiter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 133 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Gregory, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 134 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Reese, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 135 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Camilla Jean Palmer Revocable Living Trust, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 136 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Law, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 137 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. McKee, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 138 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Pryor, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 139 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Marcum, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 140 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006).

42-3-110. Disposal of airport property.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan, or agreement authorized by §42-3-114, an authority may, by sale, lease, or otherwise, dispose of any airport, air navigation facility or other property, or portion thereof or interest therein, acquired pursuant to this chapter. Disposal by sale, lease, or otherwise, shall be in accordance with the laws of this state governing the disposition of other public property, except that in the case of disposal to another authority, a municipality or an agency of the state or federal government for use and operation as a public airport, the sale, lease, or other disposal may be effected in such manner and upon such terms as the commissioners of the authority may deem in the best interest of civil aviation.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 9; T.C.A., § 42-610.

Attorney General Opinions. Dissolution of a municipal airport authority created under the Airport Authorities Act. OAG 16-14, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (4/5/2016).